North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-17.5 Health Care Provider Cooperative Agreements [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35 § 10]

23-17.5-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-02.
Discussions or negotiations — Certificate of public advantage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-03.
Standards for certification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-03.1.
Active supervision. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-04.
Certificate termination. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-05.
Records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-06.
Investigation by attorney general. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-07.
Cooperative agreement enjoined — Automatic stay — Standards for adjudication. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-08.
Cancellation of a certificate of public advantage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-09.
Resolution by consent decree — Attorney’s fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-10.
Exclusion from state antitrust enforcement — Federal antitrust immunity intended — Application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-11.
Assessment — Health care cooperative agreement fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.

23-17.5-12.
Health care cooperative agreement fund — Appropriation. [Repealed]